District of Columbia statutes.
31-2407

Priorities for the payment of personal injury protection benefits.

(a)

The insurer responsible for the payment of personal injury protection benefits shall be determined in accordance with, and in the order of, priorities set forth in this section. The insurer liable to pay benefits is:

(1)

The insurer providing personal injury protection insurance under which the victim is the named insured; or

(2)

The insurer providing personal injury protection with respect to the motor vehicle in which, at the time of the accident, the victim is present.

(b)

If 2 or more obligations to pay personal injury protection benefits apply equally to an injury, the insurer against which the claim is asserted first shall process and pay the claim as if wholly responsible, subject to subsequent contribution pro rata from any other insurer for the amount of benefits paid and for the cost of processing the claim.

Sept. 18, 1982, D.C. Law 4-155, § 8, 29 DCR 3491
Mar. 4, 1986, D.C. Law 6-96, § 2(f), 32 DCR 7245
1981 Ed., § 35-2107.